Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 10. Limited Liability Partnership.

§79-13-1001.
Statement of qualification.

A partnership may become a limited liability partnership pursuant to this section.

The terms and conditions on which a partnership becomes a limited liability partnership must be approved by the vote necessary to amend the partnership agreement except, in the case of a partnership agreement that expressly considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, the vote necessary to amend those provisions.

After the approval required by subsection (b), a partnership may become a limited liability partnership by filing a statement of qualification. The statement must contain:

The name of the partnership;

The street address of the partnership’s chief executive office and, if different, the street address of an office in this state, if any;

If the partnership does not have an office in this state, the information required by Section 79-35-5(a);

A statement that the partnership elects to be a limited liability partnership; and

A deferred effective date, if any.

[Reserved]

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership is effective on the later of the filing of the statement or a date specified in the statement. The status remains effective, regardless of changes in the partnership, until it is canceled pursuant to Section 79-13-105(d).

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership and the liability of its partners is not affected by errors or later changes in the information required to be contained in the statement of qualification under subsection (c).

The filing of a statement of qualification establishes that a partnership has satisfied all conditions precedent to the qualification of the partnership as a limited liability partnership.

An amendment or cancellation of a statement of qualification is effective when it is filed or on a deferred effective date specified in the amendment or cancellation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1001; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 76, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “the information required by Section 79-35-5(a)” for “the street address of an office in this state, if any” in (c)(3); and deleted (d), which read: “The agent of a limited liability partnership for service of process must be an individual who is a resident of this state or other person authorized to do business in this state” and reserved the subsection designator.

Execution, filing and recording of statements, see § 79-13-105.

Filing fees, see § 79-13-105.

Foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 through 79-13-1105.

§79-13-1002.
Name.

The name of a limited liability partnership must end with “Registered Limited Liability Partnership”, “Limited Liability Partnership”, “R.L.L.P.,” “L.L.P.,” “RLLP” or “LLP.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1002, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1003.
Administrative dissolution of statement of qualification; grounds.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-13-1004 to administratively dissolve a statement of qualification if:

The limited liability partnership does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any fees, taxes, or penalties imposed by this chapter or other law;

[Reserved]

The limited liability partnership is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The limited liability partnership does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days that its registered agent has been changed or that its registered agent has resigned; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the limited liability partnership pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 77, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

§79-13-1004.
Administrative dissolution of statement of qualification; procedure.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-13-1003 for the administrative dissolution of a statement of qualification, the Secretary of State shall serve the limited liability partnership with written notice of his determination, except that such determination may be served by first-class mail.

If the limited liability partnership does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the statement of qualification by signing a certification of the dissolution that recites the ground for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve the limited liability partnership with a copy of the certificate, except that such certificate may be served by first-class mail.

The administrative dissolution of a statement of qualification affects only the partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership and is not an event of dissolution of the partnership.

A limited liability partnership administratively dissolved continues its existence but may carry on only business necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under Section 79-13-803.

The administrative dissolution of the statement of qualification of a limited partnership does not terminate the authority of its agent for service of process.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 78, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

§79-13-1005.
Administrative dissolution of statement of qualification; reinstatement.

A limited liability partnership whose statement of qualification has been administratively dissolved under Section 79-13-1004 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The application must:

Recite the name of the limited liability partnership and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

State that the limited liability partnership’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-13-1002; and

Contain a certificate from the Mississippi Department of Revenue reciting that all taxes owed by the limited liability partnership have been paid.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, the Secretary of State shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites this determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate and serve the limited liability partnership with a copy of the certificate.

When the reinstatement is effective:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution;

Any liability incurred by a member after the administrative dissolution and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred; and

The limited liability partnership may resume its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 79; Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment substituted “Section 79-13-1004” for “Section 79-14-1004” in (a).

§79-13-1006.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a limited liability partnership’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the Secretary of State shall serve the limited liability partnership with a record that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The limited liability partnership may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court of the county where the limited partnership is domiciled within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The limited liability partnership appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of dissolution, the limited liability partnership’s application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved limited liability partnership or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 80, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.